District of Columbia statutes.
7-857.04

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 17, 2015, D.C. Law 21-20, § 5, 62 DCR 8845